Maryland, session 2026, HB0313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 8–222 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE;
OR
Article – Real Property
8–222.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ADVERSE ACTION” MEANS:
(I) DENIAL OF A PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S RENTAL
APPLICATION;

HOUSE BILL 313 3
(II) CONDITIONAL ACCEPTANCE OF A PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S
RENTAL APPLICATION; OR
(III) PLACEMENT OF A PROSPECTIVE TENANT ON A WAITING
LIST BECAUSE OF SCREENING CRITERIA.
(3) (I) “CONDITIONAL ACCEPTANCE” MEANS THE ACCEPTANCE OF
A PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S APPLICATION CONTINGENT ON A SUBSEQUENT ACTION
OR CONDITION.
(II) “CONDITIONAL ACCEPTANCE” INCLUDES:
1. SUBJECTING A PROSPECTIVE TENANT TO AN
INCREASED RENTAL RATE;
2. REQUIRING AN INCREASED SECURITY DEPOSIT; AND
3. REQUIRING A COSIGNATURE.
(4) “OUTCOME” INCLUDES A CASE:
(I) THAT WAS DISMISSED;
(II) THAT WAS CANCELED;
(III) THAT WAS REDEEMED; OR
(IV) WHERE THE TENANT PREVAILED.
(5) (I) “PROCEEDING” MEANS A FAILURE TO PAY RENT
PROCEEDING INITIATED BY A LANDLORD UNDER § 8–401 OF THIS TITLE NOT
RESULTING IN A JUDGMENT OF POSSESSION IN FAVOR OF THE LANDLORD.
(II) “PROCEEDING” INCLUDES THE FILING OF A PETITION BY A
LANDLORD FOR THE FAILURE OF A TENANT TO PAY RENT REGARDLESS OF WHETHER
A HEARING IS HELD BY THE COURT.
(5) (6) (I) “RECORD” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–502(A)
OF THIS TITLE MEANS AN OFFICIAL RECORD OF AN ACTIVE, PENDING, OR FINAL
COURT PROCEEDING KEPT BY THE CLERK OF THE COURT OR OTHER COURT
PERSONNEL.
(II) “RECORD” INCLUDES:

HOUSE BILL 313
1. AN INDEX, A DOCKET ENTRY, A PETITION, A
MEMORANDUM, A TRANSCRIPTION OF PROCEEDINGS, AN ELECTRONIC RECORDING,
AN ORDER, AND A JUDGMENT; AND
2. ANY ELECTRONIC INFORMATION ABOUT A
PROCEEDING ON A WEBSITE MAINTAINED BY THE MARYLAND JUDICIARY.
(6) (7) (I) “SHIELDED RECORD” MEANS A RECORD PROTECTED
FROM PUBLIC INSPECTION UNDER § 8–502 OR § 8–503 OF THIS TITLE OR THAT THE
COURT HAS OTHERWISE SEALED OR ORDERED INACCESSIBLE TO MEMBERS OF THE
PUBLIC.
(II) “SHIELDED RECORD” INCLUDES A RECORD SHIELDED,
SUPPRESSED, OR SEALED IN ANOTHER JURISDICTION UNDER PROVISIONS
EQUIVALENT TO THOSE OF THE STATE.
(7) (8) “TENANT SCREENING REPORT” MEANS ANY CONSUMER
REPORT, TENANT SCREENING SERVICE PRODUCT, OR SIMILAR INFORMATION USED
BY A LANDLORD TO EVALUATE A RENTAL APPLICATION.
(B) (1) A LANDLORD MAY NOT COLLECT AN APPLICATION FEE OR
SCREENING FEE FOR A RENTAL UNIT UNLESS THE RENTAL UNIT:
(I) IS AVAILABLE FOR LEASE; OR
(II) WILL BECOME AVAILABLE FOR LEASE WITHIN 30 DAYS
AFTER THE LANDLORD RECEIVES THE APPLICATION.
(2) BEFORE ACCEPTING AN APPLICATION FEE OR A SCREENING FEE,
A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN DISCLOSURE TO A PROSPECTIVE TENANT
THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT SHALL CREATE
A DISCLOSURE FORM THAT INCLUDES:
(I) THE INFORMATION INCLUDED IN A TENANT SCREENING
REPORT;
(II) THE CRITERIA THAT MAY RESULT IN THE DENIAL OR
CONDITIONAL ACCEPTANCE OF A RENTAL APPLICATION;
(III) THE NAME AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF ANY CONSUMER
REPORTING AGENCY OR TENANT SCREENING SERVICE USED BY THE LANDLORD TO
OBTAIN A TENANT SCREENING REPORT; AND

HOUSE BILL 313 5
(IV) THE MAXIMUM AMOUNT THAT MAY BE CHARGED FOR AN
APPLICATION FEE.
(2) BEFORE ACCEPTING AN APPLICATION FEE OR A SCREENING FEE,
A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE THE DISCLOSURE DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION TO A PROSPECTIVE TENANT.
(C) (1) A LANDLORD MAY NOT TAKE ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST A
PROSPECTIVE TENANT UNLESS THE LANDLORD PROVIDES TO THE PROSPECTIVE
TENANT:
(I) WRITTEN NOTICE:
1. STATING THE SPECIFIC REASONS FOR THE ADVERSE
ACTION;
2. AFFIRMING THE LANDLORD DID NOT KNOWINGLY
CONSIDER ANY PROCEEDING OR SHIELDED RECORD; AND
3. AFFIRMING THE LANDLORD DID NOT RELY ON AN
UNSHIELDED RECORD THAT IS 3 YEARS OLD OR OLDER IN A TENANT SCREENING
REPORT THAT DID NOT PROVIDE REASONABLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION
REGARDING THE DISPOSITION OR OUTCOME OF THE CLAIM AGAINST THE
PROSPECTIVE TENANT; AND
3. 4. IDENTIFYING THE TENANT SCREENING REPORT OR
OTHER INFORMATION THE LANDLORD RELIED ON IN CONSIDERING THE
PROSPECTIVE TENANT; AND
(II) A COPY OF ANY SCREENING REPORT USED BY THE
LANDLORD IN REACHING A DETERMINATION OR INFORMATION SUFFICIENT TO
ALLOW THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT TO INDEPENDENTLY OBTAIN A COPY OF THE
TENANT SCREENING REPORT; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED FOR ADVERSE
ACTION NOTICE UNDER THE FEDERAL FAIR CREDIT REPORTING ACT.
(2) (I) A PROSPECTIVE TENANT SHALL BE ALLOWED TO DISPUTE
AND PROVIDE EVIDENCE REGARDING INACCURATE OR INCOMPLETE INFORMATION
CONTAINED IN A TENANT SCREENING REPORT.
(II) A LANDLORD THAT USES A SCREENING REPORT SHALL
NOTIFY A PROSPECTIVE TENANT OF THE RIGHT TO DISPUTE THE REPORT.

HOUSE BILL 313
(D) (1) A LANDLORD MAY NOT:
(1) (I) REQUEST OR REQUIRE A PROSPECTIVE TENANT TO
DISCLOSE INFORMATION RELATING TO:
(I) A PROCEEDING AGAINST THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT; OR
(II) A A SHIELDED RECORD;
(2) (II) MAKE AN ORAL OR WRITTEN INQUIRY TO ANY PERSON
REGARDING A PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S PROCEEDING OR SHIELDED RECORD;
(3) (III) 1. CONSIDER SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, RELY ON A PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S PROCEEDING OR SHIELDED
RECORD IN MAKING A DETERMINATION REGARDING A RENTAL APPLICATION; OR
2. RELY ON AN UNSHIELDED RECORD THAT IS 3 YEARS
OLD OR OLDER IN A TENANT SCREENING REPORT THAT DID NOT PROVIDE
REASONABLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION REGARDING THE DISPOSITION OR
OUTCOME OF THE CLAIM AGAINST THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT;
(4) (IV) CONDITIONALLY ACCEPT A PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S
APPLICATION CONTINGENT ON THE PROSPECTIVE TENANT’S DISCLOSURE OF A
PROCEEDING OR SHIELDED RECORD; OR
(5) (V) TAKE ADVERSE ACTION BASED ON A PROSPECTIVE
TENANT’S REFUSAL TO DISCLOSE A PROCEEDING OR SHIELDED RECORD; OR
(VI) TAKE ADVERSE ACTION BASED SOLELY ON AN UNSHIELDED
RECORD THAT DOES NOT INCLUDE REASONABLY AVAILABLE INFORMATION
INDICATING THE DISPOSITION OR OUTCOME OF THE CLAIM AGAINST THE
PROSPECTIVE TENANT.
(2) A LANDLORD IS NOT LIABLE FOR A DETERMINATION BASED ON A
SHIELDED RECORD IF:
(I) THE LANDLORD RELIED IN GOOD FAITH ON A TENANT
SCREENING REPORT PRODUCED BY A THIRD PARTY; AND
(II) THE LANDLORD DID NOT HAVE ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE THAT
THE RECORD WAS SHIELDED.
(E) (1) A PERSON THAT PRODUCES TENANT SCREENING REPORTS:

HOUSE BILL 313 7
(I) SHALL IMPLEMENT AND MAINTAIN REASONABLE
PROCEDURES TO PREVENT THE DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION REGARDING A
PROCEEDING OR SHIELDED RECORD; AND
(II) MAY NOT DISCLOSE INFORMATION ABOUT A PROCEEDING
OR SHIELDED RECORD; AND
(III) FOR AN UNSHIELDED RECORD, SHALL CLEARLY AND
ACCURATELY INDICATE THE DISPOSITION OR OUTCOME OF THE CLAIM AGAINST THE
SUBJECT OF THE TENANT SCREENING REPORT.
(2) A PERSON THAT DISCLOSES INFORMATION OF A PROCEEDING OR
SHIELDED RECORD SHALL PROVIDE TO ALL PARTIES A CORRECTED TENANT
SCREENING REPORT WITH THE IMPROPERLY DISCLOSED INFORMATION REMOVED
WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER LEARNING OF THE DISCLOSURE.
(F) A PROSPECTIVE TENANT MAY NOT WAIVE ANY OF THE PROTECTIONS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION AND ANY ATTEMPTED WAIVER BY A
PROSPECTIVE TENANT IS VOID.
(G) A LANDLORD THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B), (C), OR (D) OF THIS
SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $500 FOR EACH
VIOLATION.
(H) (1) A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) IS AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE
WITHIN THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(II) IS SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY
PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE, EXCEPT
§ 13–411 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN AN INDIVIDUAL INJURED
BY A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF THIS SECTION MAY SEEK INJUNCTIVE
RELIEF AND A REFUND OF ANY APPLICATION OR SCREENING FEE PAID BY THE
INDIVIDUAL.
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL INJURED BY A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR:
(1) DAMAGES;

HOUSE BILL 313
(2) A REFUND OF ANY APPLICATION OR SCREENING FEE;
(3) INJUNCTIVE AND OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF; AND
(4) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COURT COSTS.
(J) AN INDIVIDUAL INJURED BY A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR INJUNCTIVE OR OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF,
INCLUDING REQUIRING A TENANT SCREENING COMPANY TO SEND CORRECTIVE
NOTICES.
(K) EXCEPT FOR THE PROHIBITION AGAINST THE KNOWING USE OF A
SHIELDED RECORD IN REACHING A DETERMINATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION, THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED TO PROHIBIT A LANDLORD
FROM RELYING ON A LAWFULLY OBTAINED CREDIT SCORE OR CONSUMER REPORT
SOLELY BECAUSE THE CREDIT SCORE OR CONSUMER REPORT MAY RELATE TO
EVICTION ACTIVITY.
(K) (L) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.